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DI3RT-01

CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC P0500/42 | Vehicle Speed Sensor Malfunction
(No.1 Speed Sensor)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The No. 1 speed sensor detects the rotation speed ofthe transmission output shaft and sends signalstothe
Engine and ECT ECU. The Engine and ECT ECU determines the vehicle speed based on these signals.
An AC voltage is generated in the vehicle speed sensor coil as the rotor mounted on the output shaft rotates,
and this voltage is sent to the Engine and ECT ECU.
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No.1 Speed Sensor Combination Meter Engine and ECT ECU
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DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

No vehicle speed sensor signal to Engine and ECT ECU under
conditions (a) and (b):

P0500/42 (a) Neutral start switchis OFF

(b) Vehicle is being driven

*OpenorshortinNo. 1 speedsensorcircuit
*No.1 speedsensor

*EngineandECTECU

* Automatic transmission assembly

Clutch or brake slips or gear broken
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

Read freeze frame data using hand-held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions when
the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-
ning or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air-fuel ratio lean or rich, etc. at the time of the malfunction.

1 Connect hand-held tester and read value of vehicle speed value.

PREPARATION:
(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Start the engine and the hand-held tester main switch ON.
CHECK:
Drive the vehicle and read vehicle speed value.
OK:
Vehicle speed matches tester speed value

(See page IN-35).

NG> Check and replace Engine and ECT ECU

@

2 [ Check speedometer circuit (See page BE-2).

NG> Repair or replace speedometer circuit.
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3 | Check resistance between terminals SPD of Engine and ECT ECU connector and

body ground.
ON PREPARATION:
@ (@) Remove the glove compartment door
= — (See page BO-127).
(b) Disconnect the cruise control ECU connector.
(c) Disconnect the connector of the Engine and ECT ECU.
/N (d)  Shift the shift lever to neutral.
{ -) \V/ (+) SPD (e) Jack up the rear wheel on one side
1 (f)  Turn ignition switch ON.

D01655 M

Check voltage between terminals SPD of the Engine and ECT

ECU connector and body ground when the wheel is turned

slowly.
OK:
Voltage is generated intermittently
9-14V
ov Turn the wheel AT7809

tween combination meter and Engine and ECT

NG Check and repair harness and connector be-
ECU.

@

Check and replace Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN-35).
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